src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-CLASS_AL_STEM_2_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - sg̲ál - ENGLISH : # CLASS_AL_STEM_2

     sg̲ál+V+Interr+Past: sg̲áalaa
     sg̲ál+V+Indir+Past: sg̲áalaan
     sg̲ál+V+Rel+Evid: sg̲áalaas
     sg̲ál+V+Past+NonFact: sg̲áalaa.ang
     sg̲ál+V+Cert+Pres: sg̲áalʼahlanggang
     sg̲ál+V+Cert+Past: sg̲áalʼahlanggan
     sg̲ál+V+Cert+Past+Hab: sg̲áalʼahlanggiinii
     sg̲ál+V+Cert+Rel: sg̲áalʼahlans
     sg̲ál+V+Ints+Past: sg̲áalaaʼahlang
     sg̲ál+V+Cont: sg̲áalaaʼahlanggaa
     sg̲ál+V+Ctfact+Pres: sg̲áalaaʼahlanggang
     sg̲ál+V+Rflx: sg̲áalʼahl
